Maryland, session 2025, HB1350.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–308.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Person in a position of authority” means a person who:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1350*

HOUSE BILL 1350
1. A. is at least 21 years old and works for remuneration
or as a volunteer for a public or private preschool, elementary school, or secondary school;
or
B. is at least 22 years old and works for remuneration or as a
volunteer for a program; and
2. exercises supervision over or works or interacts with one
or more minors who attend the school or participate in the program.
(ii) “Person in a position of authority” includes a principal, vice
principal, teacher, coach, or school counselor at a public or private preschool, elementary
school, or secondary school.
(3) “Program” means:
(i) an individual, a business, a religious or faith–based institution,
or an organization that provides, on a for–profit or nonprofit basis, instructional, coaching,
recreational, spiritual, character–building, or supervisory services or activities for minors,
including:
1. sports, music, dance, art, or martial arts coaching or
instruction;
2. tutoring or academic enrichment;
3. day care or after school care;
4. scouting; or
5. day or overnight camping; or
(ii) any unit of local, State, or federal government.
(b) A person may not engage in:
(1) sexual contact with another without the consent of the other;
(2) except as provided in § 3–307(a)(4) of this subtitle, a sexual act with
another if the victim is 14 or 15 years old, and the person performing the sexual act is at
least 4 years older than the victim; or
(3) except as provided in § 3–307(a)(5) of this subtitle, vaginal intercourse
with another if the victim is 14 or 15 years old, and the person performing the act is at least
4 years older than the victim.

HOUSE BILL 1350 3
(c) (1) Except as provided in § 3–307(a)(4) of this subtitle or subsection (b)(2)
of this section, a person in a position of authority may not engage in a sexual act or sexual
contact with a minor who, at the time of the sexual act or sexual contact:
(i) is a student enrolled at a school where the person in a position of
authority works; or
(ii) 1. is participating in a program for which the person in a
position of authority works; and
2. is at least 6 years younger than the person in a position of
authority.
(2) Except as provided in § 3–307(a)(5) of this subtitle or subsection (b)(3)
of this section, a person in a position of authority may not engage in vaginal intercourse
with a minor who, at the time of the vaginal intercourse:
(i) is a student enrolled at a school where the person in a position of
authority works; or
(ii) 1. is participating in a program for which the person in a
position of authority works; and
2. is at least 6 years younger than the person in a position of
authority.
(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a person who
violates this section is guilty of the misdemeanor of sexual offense in the fourth degree and
on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 1 year or a fine not exceeding $1,000
or both.
(2) (i) On conviction of a violation of this section, a person [who] IS
SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 3 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING
$1,000 OR BOTH IF THE PERSON has been convicted on a prior occasion not arising from
the same incident:
1. of a violation of § 3–303, § 3–304, §§ 3–307 through 3–310
of this subtitle, § 3–311 or § 3–312 of this subtitle as the sections existed before October 1,
2017, § 3–315 of this subtitle, or § 3–602 of this title [is subject to imprisonment not
exceeding 3 years or a fine not exceeding $1,000 or both]; OR
2. IN ANOTHER STATE OR IN A FEDERAL, MILITARY, OR
NATIVE AMERICAN TRIBAL COURT OF A CRIME THAT, IF COMMITTED IN THIS STATE,
WOULD CONSTITUTE A VIOLATION OF § 3–303, § 3–304, §§ 3–307 THROUGH 3–310 OF
THIS SUBTITLE, § 3–311 OR § 3–312 OF THIS SUBTITLE AS THE SECTIONS EXISTED
BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2017, § 3–315 OF THIS SUBTITLE, OR § 3–602 OF THIS TITLE.

HOUSE BILL 1350
(ii) If the State intends to proceed against a person under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, it shall comply with the procedures set forth in the
Maryland Rules for the indictment and trial of a subsequent offender.
(e) (1) Unless specifically charged by the State, a violation of this section may
not be considered a lesser included crime of any other crime.
(2) A sentence imposed under this section may be imposed separate from
and consecutive to or concurrent with a sentence for any crime based on the act establishing
the violation of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.